Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 81

Commission to Assist Persons Who Have Suffered Catastrophic Financial Loss [Repealed.]

12-81-101. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This chapter, concerning members of a catastrophic financial loss assistance commission, was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 1133, § 2. The chapter was derived from Acts 1991, No. 269, § 1.